Idaho statutes. Title 71 WEIGHTS AND MEASURES
Chapter 4
LICENSING OF WEIGHMASTERS

Sec.

§ 71-401. Short title — Definitions.

This chapter may be cited as the “Weighmaster Standards Act.”

Definitions — When used in this chapter:

“Director” means the director of the Idaho department of agriculture.

“Department” means the department of agriculture of the state of Idaho.

“Weighmaster” means any person who weighs grains, dry peas, potato starch, dry beans, leguminous and all other small seeds, hay, wool, bulk potatoes, bulk fertilizers, sugar beets, and feeds.

§ 71-402. Weighmasters.

Any person acting as a weighmaster shall comply with the provisions of this act.

§ 71-403. Bond. [Repealed.]

§ 71-404. Posting of license. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 141, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 71-405. Certified copies of license. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 141, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 71-406. Signature of licensed weighmaster. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 141, § 5, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 71-407. Giving false weight tickets.

Any person who shall mark, alter, stamp, or write any false weight ticket, scale ticket, or weight certificate, knowing it to be false, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) for each offense, or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both.

§ 71-408. Enforcement of act — Rules and regulations.

The director of the department of agriculture may adopt and publish rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this act.

§ 71-409. Disposition of fees.

All fees collected by the director of the department of agriculture under the provisions of this act shall be deposited in the weights and measures dedicated fund [weights and measures inspection fund] of the state treasury.

§ 71-410. Revocation of license. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 141, § 6, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 71-411. Standard weight and tare ticket.

All commodities weighed on public platform scales, having a capacity of five (5) tons or more, shall be recorded on standard weight and tare ticket prepared in triplicate, stating:

Name and address of licensed weighing agency;

Serial number;

Date;

Owner of commodity weighed;

Kind of commodity being weighed;

Gross weight of load;

Tare;

Net weight; and

Full signature of weigher.

Weight and tare tickets shall be kept and maintained by the weighmaster or the weighing facility for three (3) years.